Florida, session 2026, SB1540.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 19 20 Section 1.âSection 937.032, Florida Statutes, is created to 21 read: 22 937.032âMissing endangered persons; hospital records; 23 access and use.â 24 (1)âIn accordance with 45 C.F.R. s. 164.512(f)(2), a 25 hospital may disclose any of the following information about an 26 admitted patient to a law enforcement agency, either upon 27 request or pursuant to subsection (2), for the limited purpose 28 of identifying or locating a missing endangered person: 29 (a)âName and address. 30 (b)âDate and place of birth. 31 (c)âSocial security number. 32 (d)âABO blood type and rh factor. 33 (e)âType of injury. 34 (f)âDate and time of treatment. 35 (g)âDate and time of death, if applicable. 36 (h)âA description of distinguishing physical 37 characteristics, including height, weight, gender, race, hair 38 and eye color, scars, tattoos, and presence or absence of facial 39 hair, such as a beard or moustache. 40 (2)âHospitals may search and use hospital records of 41 admitted patients for purposes of identifying potential matches 42 to persons listed as missing on the Missing Endangered Persons 43 Information Clearinghouse. If it is suspected that an admitted 44 patient of the hospital matches the description of a missing 45 endangered person in the clearinghouse, the hospital may report 46 any of the information specified in subsection (1) to the 47 appropriate law enforcement agency. 48 (3)âThe Agency for Health Care Administration may adopt 49 rules to implement uniform reporting procedures for hospitals 50 under this section. 51 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.